California statutes. Family Code
 clerk’s office with the party who is not stationed overseas and present the original power of attorney duly signed by the party stationed overseas and acknowledged before a notary or witnessed by two officers of the United States Armed Forces. Copies in any form, including by facsimile, are not acceptable. The power of attorney shall state the full given names at birth, or by court order, of the parties to be married, and that the power of attorney is solely for the purpose of authorizing the attorney in fact to obtain a marriage license on the person’s behalf and participate in the solemnization of the marriage. The original power of attorney shall be a part of the marriage certificate upon registration. The completion of
 a power of attorney shall be the sole determinant as to whether the county clerk’s office and the State Registrar will accept the power of attorney.

(c) A contract of marriage, if otherwise duly made, shall not be invalidated for want of conformity to the requirements of any religious sect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 130, Sec. 1.   (AB 2128)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

421.

Before solemnizing a marriage, the person solemnizing the marriage shall require the presentation of the marriage license. If the person solemnizing the marriage has reason to doubt the correctness of the statement of facts in the marriage license, the person must be satisfied as to the correctness of the statement of facts before solemnizing the marriage. For this purpose, the person may administer oaths and examine the parties and witnesses in the same manner as the county clerk does before issuing the license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

422.

The person solemnizing a marriage shall sign and print or type upon the marriage license a statement, in the form prescribed by the State Department of Public Health, showing all of the following:

(a) The fact, date (month, day, year), and place (city and county) of solemnization.

(b) The printed names, signatures, and mailing addresses of at least one, and no more than two, witnesses to the ceremony.

(c) The official position of the person solemnizing the marriage, or of the denomination of which that person is a priest, minister, rabbi, or other
 authorized person of any religious denomination.

(d) The person solemnizing the marriage shall also type or print
 their name and mailing address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 9.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

423.

(a) The person solemnizing the marriage shall return the marriage license, endorsed as required in Section 422, to the county recorder of the county in which the license was issued within 10 days after the ceremony.

(b) For purposes of Section 102356 of the Health and Safety Code, the person solemnizing the marriage shall include with the marriage license described in subdivision (a) a copy of the court order granting permission to marry described in Section 304, if one or both of the parties to the marriage were minors at the time of solemnization of the marriage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 660, Sec. 6.   (SB 273)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

425.

If no record of the solemnization of a California marriage previously contracted under this division for that marriage is known to exist, the parties may purchase a License and Certificate of Declaration of Marriage from the county clerk in the parties’ county of residence one year or more from the date of the marriage. The license and certificate shall be returned to the county recorder of the county in which the license was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

426.

If for sufficient reason, as described in subdivision (d), either or both of the parties to be married are physically unable to appear in person before the county clerk, a marriage license may be issued by the county clerk to the person solemnizing the marriage if the following requirements are met:

(a) The person solemnizing the marriage physically presents an affidavit to the county clerk explaining the reason for the inability to appear.

(b) The affidavit is signed under penalty of perjury by the person solemnizing the marriage and by both parties.

(c) The signature of any party to be married who is unable to appear in person before the county clerk is authenticated by a notary public or a court prior to the county clerk issuing the marriage license.

(d) Sufficient reason includes proof of hospitalization, incarceration, or any other reason proved to the satisfaction of the county clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. CONFIDENTIAL MARRIAGE [500. - 536.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [500. - 511.]

500.

When two unmarried people, not minors, have been living together as spouses, they may be married pursuant to this chapter by a person authorized to solemnize a marriage under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 400) of Part 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 474, Sec. 6.   (AB 2882)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

500.5.

For purposes of this part, the document issued by the county clerk is a marriage license until it is registered with the county clerk, at which time the license becomes a marriage certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

501.

(a) Except as provided in Section 502, a confidential marriage license shall be issued by the county clerk upon the personal appearance together of the parties to be married and their payment of the fees required by Sections 26840.1 and 26840.8 of the Government Code and any fee imposed pursuant to the authorization of Section 26840.3 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 620, Sec. 4.   (AB 583)   Effective October 7, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

502.

If for sufficient reason, as described in subdivision (d), either or both of the parties to be married are physically unable to appear in person before the county clerk, a confidential marriage license may be issued by the county clerk to the person solemnizing the marriage if the following requirements are met:

(a) The person solemnizing the marriage physically presents an affidavit to the county clerk explaining the reason for the inability to appear.

(b) The affidavit is signed under penalty of perjury by the person
 solemnizing the marriage and by both parties.

(c) The signature of any party to be married who is unable to appear in person before the county clerk is authenticated by a notary public or a court prior to the county clerk issuing the confidential marriage license.

(d) Sufficient reason includes proof of hospitalization, incarceration, or any other reason proved to the satisfaction of the county clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

503.

The county clerk shall issue a confidential marriage license upon the request of a notary public approved by the county clerk to issue confidential marriage licenses pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 530) and upon payment by the notary public of the fees specified in Sections 26840.1 and 26840.8 of the Government Code. The parties shall reimburse a notary public who issues a confidential marriage license for the amount of the fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

504.

A confidential marriage license is valid only for a period of 90 days after its issuance by the county clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 16.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

505.

(a) The form of the confidential marriage license shall be prescribed by the State Registrar of Vital Statistics.

(b) The form shall be designed to require that the parties to be married declare or affirm that they meet all of the requirements of this chapter.

(c) The form shall include an affidavit, which the bride and groom shall sign, affirming that they have received the brochure provided for in Section 358.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

506.

(a) The confidential marriage license shall be presented to the person solemnizing the marriage.

(b) Upon performance of the ceremony, the solemnization section on the confidential marriage license shall be completed by the person solemnizing the marriage.

(c) The confidential marriage license shall be returned by the person solemnizing the marriage to the office of the county clerk in the county in which the license was issued within 10 days after the ceremony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

508.

Upon issuance of a confidential marriage license, parties shall be provided with an application to obtain a certified copy of the confidential marriage certificate from the county clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

509.

(a) A party to a confidential marriage may obtain a certified copy of the confidential marriage certificate from the county clerk of the county in which the certificate is filed by submitting an application that satisfies the requirements of Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 103525) of Part 1 of Division 102 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Copies of a confidential marriage certificate may be issued to the parties to the marriage upon payment of the fee equivalent to that charged for copies of a marriage certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 412, Sec. 2.   (AB 130)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

510.

(a) If a confidential marriage license is lost, damaged, or destroyed after the performance of the marriage, but before it is returned to the county clerk, or deemed unacceptable for registration by the county clerk, the person solemnizing the marriage, in order to comply with Section 506, shall obtain a duplicate marriage license by filing an affidavit setting forth the facts with the county clerk of the county in which the license was issued.

(b) The duplicate license may not be issued later than one year after the date of the marriage and shall be returned by the person solemnizing the marriage to the county clerk within one year of the
 date of the marriage.

(c) The county clerk may charge a fee to cover the actual costs of issuing a duplicate marriage license.

(d) If a marriage license is lost, damaged, or destroyed before a marriage ceremony takes place, the applicants shall purchase a new marriage license and the old license shall be voided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 27.   (AB 3364)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

511.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the county clerk shall maintain confidential marriage certificates filed pursuant to Section 506 as permanent records which shall not be open to public inspection except upon order of the court issued upon a showing of good cause. The confidential marriage license is a confidential record and not open to public inspection without an order from the court.

(b) The county clerk shall keep all original certificates of confidential marriages for one year from the date of filing. After one
 year, the clerk may reproduce the certificates pursuant to Section 26205 of the Government Code, and dispose of the original certificates. The county clerk shall promptly seal and store at least one original negative of each microphotographic film made in a manner and place as reasonable to ensure its preservation indefinitely against loss, theft, defacement, or destruction. The microphotograph shall be made in a manner that complies with the minimum standards or guidelines, or both, recommended by the American National Standards Institute or the Association for Information and Image Management. Every reproduction shall be deemed and considered an original. A certified copy of any reproduction shall be deemed and considered a certified copy of the original.

(c) The county clerk may conduct a search for a confidential marriage certificate for the purpose of confirming the existence of a marriage, but the date of the marriage and any other information contained in the certificate
 shall not be disclosed except upon order of the court.

(d) The county clerk shall, not less than quarterly, transmit copies of all original confidential marriage certificates retained, or originals of reproduced confidential marriage certificates filed after January 1, 1982, to the State Registrar of Vital Statistics. The registrar may destroy the copies so transmitted after they have been indexed. The registrar may respond to an inquiry as to the existence of a marriage performed pursuant to this chapter, but shall not disclose the date of the marriage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Approval of Notaries to Authorize Confidential Marriages [530. - 536.]

530.

(a) No notary public shall issue a confidential marriage license pursuant to this part unless the notary public is approved by the county clerk to issue confidential marriage licenses pursuant to this chapter.

(b) A violation of subdivision (a) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or six months in jail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

531.

(a) An application for approval to authorize confidential marriages pursuant to this part shall be submitted to the county clerk in the county in which the notary public who is applying for the approval resides. The county clerk shall exercise reasonable discretion as to whether to approve applications.

(b) The application shall include all of the following:

(1) The full name of the applicant.

(2) The date of birth of the applicant.

(3) The
 applicant’s current residential address and telephone number.

(4) The address and telephone number of the place where the applicant will issue confidential marriage licenses.

(5) The full name of the applicant’s employer if the applicant is employed by another person.

(6) Whether or not the applicant has engaged in any of the acts specified in Section 8214.1 of the Government Code.

(c) The application shall be accompanied by the fee provided for in Section 536.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

532.

No approval, or renewal of the approval, shall be granted pursuant to this chapter unless the notary public shows evidence of successful completion of a course of instruction concerning the issuance of confidential marriage licenses that was conducted by the county clerk in the county of registration. The course of instruction shall not exceed six hours in duration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

533.

An approval to issue confidential marriage licenses pursuant to this chapter is valid for one year. The approval may be renewed for additional one-year periods provided the following conditions are met:

(a) The applicant has not violated any of the provisions provided for in Section 531.

(b) The applicant has successfully completed the course prescribed in Section 532.

(c) The applicant has paid the renewal fee provided for in Section 536.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

534.

(a) The county clerk shall maintain a list of the notaries public who are approved to issue confidential marriage licenses. The list shall be available for inspection by the public.

(b) It is the responsibility of a notary public approved to issue confidential marriage licenses pursuant to this chapter to keep current the information required in paragraphs (1), (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 531. This information shall be used by the county clerk to update the list required to be maintained by this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

535.

(a) If, after an approval to issue confidential marriage licenses is granted pursuant to this chapter, it is discovered that the notary public has engaged in any of the actions specified in Section 8214.1 of the Government Code, the approval shall be revoked, and the county clerk shall notify the Secretary of State for whatever action the Secretary of State deems appropriate. Any fees paid by the notary public shall be retained by the county clerk.

(b) If a notary public who is approved to authorize confidential marriages
 pursuant to this chapter is alleged to have violated a provision of this division, the county clerk shall conduct a hearing to determine if the approval of the notary public should be suspended or revoked. The notary public may present any evidence as is necessary in the notary public’s defense. If the county clerk determines that the notary public has violated a provision of this division, the county clerk may place the notary public on probation or suspend or revoke the notary public’s registration, and any fees paid by the notary public shall be retained by the county clerk. The county clerk shall report the findings of the hearing to the Secretary of State for whatever action the Secretary of State deems appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

536.

(a) The fee for an application for approval to authorize confidential marriages pursuant to this chapter is three hundred dollars ($300).

(b) The fee for renewal of an approval is three hundred dollars ($300).

(c) Fees received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in a trust fund established by the county clerk. The money in the trust fund shall be used exclusively for the administration of the programs described in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 816, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Operative January 1, 2008, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. Remote Marriage License Issuance and Solemnization [550. - 560.]

550.

Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Section 420, a county clerk may issue a marriage license, including a confidential marriage license, or solemnize or witness a marriage ceremony under state law using remote technology pursuant to this part, except for a marriage of a minor, as set forth in Sections 302 to 304, inclusive, or any successor provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 620, Sec. 5.   (AB 583)   Effective October 7, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

552.

A couple seeking a marriage license or solemnization pursuant to this part shall present, in the manner requested by the county clerk, a copy of a valid government-issued photo identification to verify their identity and any additional documentary proof requested by the county clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 620, Sec. 5.   (AB 583)   Effective October 7, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

554.

(a) Each member of the couple shall be physically located in the State of California while using remote technology to obtain a marriage license pursuant to this part.

(b) (1) Each member of the couple shall be in the same physical location in the State of California while using remote technology to solemnize their marriage pursuant to this part.

(2) The person solemnizing the marriage, any necessary witnesses, and the county clerk shall
 all be physically located in the State of California, but may be at separate physical locations from each other and the couple solemnizing their marriage.

(c) The county clerk may require a couple to complete an affidavit, in a form provided by the county clerk, affirming that they and each individual participating in a marriage solemnization using remote technology are physically present within the State of California in compliance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 620, Sec. 5.   (AB 583)   Effective October 7, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

556.

(a) At the discretion of the county clerk, a couple applying for a marriage license using remote technology may sign their marriage license electronically or by original wet signature. The couple shall transmit a signed, legible copy of their marriage license by United States mail, fax, or electronic means directly to the county clerk, in the manner required by the county clerk.

(b) At the discretion of the county clerk, a marriage license issued using the procedure described in this part may be transmitted to the applicants by United States mail, fax, or electronic means.

(c) Before the solemnization of a marriage pursuant to this part, one or both of the parties to be married shall transmit the marriage license by United States mail, fax, or electronic means to the person solemnizing the marriage and any necessary witnesses, in the manner required by the county clerk.

(d) At the discretion of the county clerk, the person solemnizing the marriage or any necessary witnesses may sign the marriage license electronically or by original wet signature and transmit the signed marriage license by United States mail, fax, or electronic means, in the manner required by the county clerk.

(e) A county clerk who witnesses a marriage solemnized by someone other than the county clerk using remote technology may apply an electronic signature to the marriage license as a witness, and transmit the signed license to the person solemnizing the marriage by United States mail, fax, or electronic means.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 620, Sec. 5.   (AB 583)   Effective October 7, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

558.

A county clerk may provide guidance relating to marriage license applications, marriage license issuance, and the witnessing or solemnizing of the marriage ceremony when the guidance relates to the use of their remote technology pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 620, Sec. 5.   (AB 583)   Effective October 7, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

560.

For purposes of this part, “remote technology” means audiovideo technology that is provided by a county clerk and allows the couple, or the couple and others participating in a marriage solemnization, as applicable, to appear together from the same physical location and directly interact with each other and the county clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 620, Sec. 5.   (AB 583)   Effective October 7, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS DURING MARRIAGE [700. - 1620.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [700. - 755.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [700. - 700.]

700.

For the purposes of this division, a leasehold interest in real property is real property, not personal property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Relation of Spouses [720. - 721.]

720.

Spouses contract toward each other obligations of mutual respect, fidelity, and support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 82, Sec. 11.   (SB 1306)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

721.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), either spouse may enter into any transaction with the other, or with any other person, respecting property, which either might if unmarried.

(b) Except as provided in Sections 143, 144, 146, 16040, 16047, and 21385 of the Probate Code, in transactions between themselves, spouses are subject to the general rules governing fiduciary relationships that control the actions of persons occupying confidential relations with each other. This confidential relationship imposes a duty of the highest good faith and fair dealing on each spouse, and
 neither shall take any unfair advantage of the other. This confidential relationship is a fiduciary relationship subject to the same rights and duties of nonmarital business partners, as provided in Sections 16403, 16404, and 16503 of the Corporations Code, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Providing each spouse access at all times to any books kept regarding a transaction for the purposes of inspection and copying.

(2) Rendering upon request, true and full information of all things affecting any transaction that concerns the community property. Nothing in this section is intended to impose a duty for either spouse to keep detailed books and records of community property transactions.

(3) Accounting to the spouse, and holding as a trustee, any benefit or profit derived from any transaction by one
 spouse without the consent of the other spouse that concerns the community property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 43, Sec. 1.   (AB 327)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Property Rights During Marriage [750. - 755.]

750.

Spouses may hold property as joint tenants or tenants in common, or as community property, or as community property with a right of survivorship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 82, Sec. 13.   (SB 1306)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

751.

The respective interests of each spouse in community property during continuance of the marriage relation are present, existing, and equal interests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 82, Sec. 14.   (SB 1306)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

752.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, neither spouse has any interest in the separate property of the other.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 82, Sec. 15.   (SB 1306)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

753.

Notwithstanding Section 752 and except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 2045), Article 3 (commencing with Section 2047), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 2049) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 6, neither spouse may be excluded from the other’s dwelling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 99.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

754.

If notice of the pendency of a proceeding for dissolution of the marriage, for nullity of the marriage, or for legal separation of the parties is recorded in any county in which either spouse resides on real property that is the separate property of the other, the real property shall not for a period of three months thereafter be transferred, encumbered, or otherwise disposed of voluntarily or involuntarily without the joinder of both spouses, unless the court otherwise orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 82, Sec. 16.   (SB 1306)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

755.

(a) The terms “participant,” “beneficiary,” “employer,” “employee organization,” “named fiduciary,” “fiduciary,” and “administrator,” as used in subdivision (b), have the same meaning as provided in Section 3 of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406) (ERISA), as amended (29 U.S.C.A. Sec. 1002). The term “employee benefit plan” has the same meaning as provided in Section 80 of this code. The term “trustee” shall include a “named fiduciary” as that term is employed in ERISA. The term “plan sponsor” shall include an “employer” or “employee organization,” as those terms are used in ERISA (29 U.S.C.A. Sec. 1002).

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 751 and 1100, if payment or refund is made to a participant or the participant’s, employee’s, or former employee’s beneficiary or estate pursuant to an employee benefit plan including a plan governed by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406), as amended,
 the payment or refund fully discharges the plan sponsor and the administrator, trustee, or insurance company making the payment or refund from all adverse claims thereto unless, before the payment or refund is made, the plan sponsor or the administrator of the plan has received written notice by or on behalf of some other person that the other person claims to be entitled to the payment or refund or some part thereof. Nothing in this section affects or releases the participant from claims which may exist against the participant by a person other than the plan sponsor, trustee, administrator, or other person making the benefit payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. CHARACTERIZATION OF MARITAL PROPERTY [760. - 853.]



  CHAPTER 1. Community Property [760. - 761.]

760.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, all property, real or personal, wherever situated, acquired by a married person during the marriage while domiciled in this state is community property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

761.

(a) Unless the trust instrument or the instrument of transfer expressly provides otherwise, community property that is transferred in trust remains community property during the marriage, regardless of the identity of the trustee, if the trust, originally or as amended before or after the transfer, provides that the trust is revocable as to that property during the marriage and the power, if any, to modify the trust as to the rights and interests in that property during the marriage may be exercised only with the joinder or consent of both spouses.

(b) Unless the trust instrument expressly provides otherwise, a power to revoke as to community property may
 be exercised by either spouse acting alone. Community property, including any income or appreciation, that is distributed or withdrawn from a trust by revocation, power of withdrawal, or otherwise, remains community property unless there is a valid transmutation of the property at the time of distribution or withdrawal.

(c) The trustee may convey and otherwise manage and control the trust property in accordance with the provisions of the trust without the joinder or consent of either spouse unless the trust expressly requires the joinder or consent of one or both spouses.

(d) This section applies to a transfer made before, on, or after July 1, 1987.

(e) Nothing in this section affects the community character of property
 that is transferred before, on, or after July 1, 1987, in any manner or to a trust other than described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 82, Sec. 17.   (SB 1306)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Separate Property [770. - 772.]

770.

(a) Separate property of a married person includes all of the following:

(1) All property owned by the person before marriage.

(2) All property acquired by the person after marriage by gift, bequest, devise, or descent.

(3) The rents, issues, and profits of the property described in this section.

(b) A married person may, without the consent of the person’s spouse, convey the person’s separate property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

771.

(a) The earnings and accumulations of a spouse and the minor children living with, or in the custody of, the spouse, after the date of separation of the spouses, are the separate property of the spouse.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the earnings and accumulations of an unemancipated minor child related to a contract of a type described in Section 6750 shall remain the sole legal property of the minor child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 114, Sec. 2.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

772.

After entry of a judgment of legal separation of the parties, the earnings or accumulations of each party are the separate property of the party acquiring the earnings or accumulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Damages for Injuries to Married Person [780. - 783.]

780.

Except as provided in Section 781 and subject to the rules of allocation set forth in Section 2603, money and other property received or to be received by a married person in satisfaction of a judgment for damages for personal injuries, or pursuant to an agreement for the settlement or compromise of a claim for such damages, is community property if the cause of action for the damages arose during the marriage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

781.

(a) Money or other property received or to be received by a married person in satisfaction of a judgment for damages for personal injuries, or pursuant to an agreement for the settlement or compromise of a claim for those damages, is the separate property of the injured person if the cause of action for the damages arose as follows:

(1) After the entry of a judgment of dissolution of a marriage or legal separation of the parties.

(2) While the injured spouse is living separate from the other spouse.

(b) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (a), if the spouse of the injured person has paid expenses by reason of the personal injuries from separate property or from the community property, the spouse is entitled to reimbursement of the separate property or the community property for those expenses from the separate property received by the injured person under subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if one spouse has a cause of action against the other spouse that arose during the marriage of the parties, money or property paid or to be paid by or on behalf of a party to the party’s spouse of that marriage in satisfaction of a judgment for damages for personal injuries to that spouse, or pursuant to an agreement for the settlement or compromise of a claim for the damages, is the separate property of the injured spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 10.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

782.

(a) Where an injury to a married person is caused in whole or in part by the negligent or wrongful act or omission of the person’s spouse, the community property may not be used to discharge the liability of the tortfeasor spouse to the injured spouse or the liability to make contribution to a joint tortfeasor until the separate property of the tortfeasor spouse, not exempt from enforcement of a money judgment, is exhausted.

(b) This section does not prevent the use of community property to discharge a liability referred to in subdivision (a) if the injured spouse gives written consent thereto after the occurrence of the injury.

(c) This section does not affect the right to indemnity provided by an insurance or other contract to discharge the tortfeasor spouse’s liability, whether or not the consideration given for the contract consisted of community property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

782.5.

In addition to any other remedy authorized by law, when a spouse is convicted of attempting to murder the other spouse, as punishable pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 664 of the Penal Code, or of soliciting the murder of the other spouse, as punishable pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 653f of the Penal Code, the injured spouse shall be entitled to an award to the injured spouse of 100 percent of the community property interest in the retirement and pension benefits of the injured spouse.

As used in this section, “injured spouse” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4324.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 65, Sec. 1.   (AB 2674)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

783.

If a married person is injured by the negligent or wrongful act or omission of a person other than the married person’s spouse, the fact that the negligent or wrongful act or omission of the spouse of the injured person was a concurring cause of the injury is not a defense in an action brought by the injured person to recover damages for the injury except in cases where the concurring negligent or wrongful act or omission would be a defense if the marriage did not exist.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Presumptions Concerning Nature of Property [802. - 803.]

802.

The presumption that property acquired during marriage is community property does not apply to any property to which legal or equitable title is held by a person at the time of the person’s death if the marriage during which the property was acquired was terminated by dissolution of marriage more than four years before the death.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, whenever any real or personal property, or any interest therein or encumbrance thereon, was acquired before January 1, 1975, by a married woman by an instrument in writing, the following presumptions apply, and are conclusive in favor of any person dealing in good faith and for a valuable consideration with the married woman or her legal representatives or successors in interest, regardless of any change in her marital status after acquisition of the property:

(a) If acquired by the married woman, the presumption is that the property is the married woman’s separate property.
